Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB495.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and unless required under federal law, the Department for
Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of
Medicaid services are hereby prohibited from expending any Medicaid funds on any of the following:
(1) Cross-sex hormones in amounts greater than would normally be produced endogenously in a healthy
person of the same age and sex; and
(2) Gender reassignment surgery to alter or remove physical or anatomical characteristics or features that are
typical for and characteristic of a person's biological sex.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any law, administrative regulation, executive order, or directive to the
contrary, Executive Order 2024-632 shall be of no force or effect as of the effective date of this Act.
Section 3. Notwithstanding any law, administrative regulation, executive order, or directive to the
contrary, any administrative regulation, executive order, or directive that is identical to or substantially the same as
Executive Order 2024-632 shall be of no force or effect as of the effective date of this Act through January 1, 2028.
Section 4. Whereas the General Assembly seeks to protect the rights of all Kentuckians, an emergency is
declared to exist, and Sections 2 and 3 of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon
its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden March 27, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version